Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,103
Nonresident; violating terms of order; effect.

Any nonresident who violates the terms of the court or administrative order by which his or her operator's license or driving privilege was revoked, suspended, or impounded shall be subject to section 60-4,108.

Laws 1941, c. 124, § 4, p. 473;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-428;

R.S.1943, § 60-423;

Laws 1959, c. 293, § 1, p. 1098;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 79;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-423;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 53;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 23.

Defendant's analysis of this section failed to take into account other sections of statute. State v. Smith, 181 Neb. 846, 152 N.W.2d 16 (1967).